Florida, session 2026, HB233.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 316.613, Florida
Statutes, is amended, and subsection (5) of that section is
reenacted, to read:
316.613 Child restraint requirements.—
(1)(a) Every operator of a motor vehicle as defined in
this section, while transporting a child in a motor vehicle
operated on the roadways, streets, or highways of this state,
shall, if the child is 8 5 years of age or younger, provide for
protection of the child by properly using a crash-tested,
federally approved child restraint device.
1. For children aged through 3 years, such restraint
device must be a separate carrier or a vehicle manufacturer's
integrated child seat.
2. For children aged 4 through 5 years, a separate
carrier, an integrated child seat, or a child booster seat may
be used.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb233-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 233 2026
3. For children aged 6 through 8 years, such restraint
device must be a child booster seat. This subparagraph does not
apply to a child over 4 feet 9 inches in height.
(b) However, The requirement to use a child restraint
device under subparagraph (a)2. or subparagraph (a)3. this
subparagraph does not apply when a safety belt is used as
required in s. 316.614(4)(a) and the child:
1.a. Is being transported gratuitously by an operator who
is not a member of the child's immediate family;
2.b. Is being transported in a medical emergency situation
involving the child; or
3.c. Has a medical condition that necessitates an
exception as evidenced by appropriate documentation from a
health care professional.
(c)(b) The department shall provide notice of the
requirement for child restraint devices, which notice shall
accompany the delivery of each motor vehicle license tag.
(5) Any person who violates this section commits a moving
violation, punishable as provided in chapter 318 and shall have
3 points assessed against his or her driver license as set forth
in s. 322.27. In lieu of the penalty specified in s. 318.18 and
the assessment of points, a person who violates this section may
elect, with the court's approval, to participate in a child
restraint safety program approved by the chief judge of the
circuit in which the violation occurs, and, upon completing such
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb233-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 233 2026
program, the penalty specified in chapter 318 and associated
costs may be waived at the court's discretion and the assessment
of points shall be waived. The child restraint safety program
must use a course approved by the Department of Highway Safety
and Motor Vehicles, and the fee for the course must bear a
reasonable relationship to the cost of providing the course.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb233-00